Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.520

State 911 coordination office.

A state 911 coordination office, headed by the state 911 coordinator, is established in the emergency management division of the department. Duties of the office include:

(1) Administering the 911 account established in RCW 38.52.540;

(2) Seeking advice and assistance from, and providing staff support for the 911 advisory committee;

(3) Providing and supporting 911 emergency communications systems, which may include procurement, funding, ownership, and management;

(4) Assisting the counties and Washington state patrol public safety answering points by distributing state 911 emergency communications system funding within the priorities identified in RCW 38.52.545. When designated as a primary public safety answering point by the county, the state 911 coordination office may provide funding for Washington state patrol public safety answering point 911 emergency communications systems;

(5) Develop forms, submission dates, and methods as necessary for all public safety answering points to submit reports;

(6) Providing staff support and assistance to the certification board established under RCW 38.60.030 that includes, but may not be limited to:

(a) Establishing forms and procedures necessary to administer chapter 38.60 RCW;

(b) Issuing a public safety telecommunicator registration and certification to any applicant who has met the requirements for certification under chapter 38.60 RCW; and

(c) Maintaining the official record for the department of all applicants and persons with registrations and certificates under chapter 38.60 RCW;

(7) Recommending to the utilities and transportation commission by August 31st of each year the level of the state 911 emergency communications system excise tax established in RCW 82.14B.030(5) for the following year;

(8) Establishing rules that:

(a) Determine eligible components of the 911 emergency communications system, its administration, and operation that the state and county 911 excise taxes, under RCW 82.14B.030, may be used to fund;

(b) Determine how appropriated funds from the state 911 account shall be distributed, considering the baseline level of 911 emergency communications system service needs of individual counties and county-designated Washington state patrol primary public safety answering points for specific assistance; and

(c) Specify statewide 911 emergency communications system and service standards, consistent with applicable state and federal law. The authority given to the state 911 coordinator in this section is limited to setting standards as set forth in this section and does not constitute authority to regulate radio communications service companies or interconnected voice over internet protocol service companies; and

(9) Annually providing a complete report to the 911 advisory committee on:

(a) Efforts to modernize their existing 911 emergency communications system;

(b) All public safety answering points expenditures for administrative and operational costs and expenses of the 911 emergency communications system; and

(c) Any additional data that may be identified by the 911 advisory committee.

[ 2022 c 286 s 6; 2022 c 203 s 9; 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 15; 1991 c 54 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2022 c 203 s 9 and by 2022 c 286 s 6, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Effective dates—2010 1st sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 82.14B.010.

Referral to electorate—1991 c 54: See note following RCW 38.52.030.